Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-324
Street commissioner; duties.

The street commissioner of a city of the first class shall be subject to the orders of the mayor and city council by resolution, have general charge, direction, and control of all work in the streets, sidewalks, culverts, and bridges of the city, except matters in charge of the board of public works, and shall perform such other duties as the city council may require.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 31, p. 238;

R.S.1913, § 4890;

C.S.1922, § 4058;

C.S.1929, § 16-320;

R.S.1943, § 16-324;

Laws 1961, c. 42, § 1, p. 173;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 66;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 19.